Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2394.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE I-MFIREFIGHTER CANCER SCREENING PROGRAMSection 101-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Airport fire company." A fire company that does all of the following:(1) Is associated with an airport.(2) Has a mutual aid agreement with a neighboring municipality.(3) Has responded to at least 15 fire or rescue emergency calls annually to neighboring fire companies as provided in documentation requested by the commissioner."Benefits card." A card issued by the department to an eligible firefighter who is a resident of this Commonwealth."Cancer screening examination." A medically necessary and clinically appropriate examination of the body using either standard or abbreviated magnetic resonance imaging or, if the imaging is not possible, ultrasound if recommended by the 20260HB2394PN3580 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132333435 treating physician to screen for cancer when there is no abnormality seen or suspected."Commissioner." The State Fire Commissioner."Department." The Department of Health INSURANCE DEPARTMENT of the Commonwealth."Eligible firefighter." A firefighter that is eligible under section 106-M."Fire company." A volunteer fire company, a municipal fire company or a combined volunteer and municipal fire company located in this Commonwealth. The term includes an airport fire company."Fund." The Firefighter Cancer Screening Fund established under section 104-M."Health insurance policy." A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by a health insurer on or after the effective date of this definition that provides medical or health care coverage. The term does not include any of the following:(1) An accident only policy.(2) A credit only policy.(3) A long-term care policy.(4) A disability income policy.(5) A specified disease policy.(6) A Medicare Supplement policy.(7) A fixed indemnity policy.(8) A dental only policy.(9) A vision only policy.(10) A workers' compensation policy.(11) An automobile medical payment policy.(12) A policy under which benefits are provided by the 20260HB2394PN3580 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal Government to active or former military personnel and their dependents.(13) A hospital indemnity policy.(14) Any other policy providing for limited benefits."Health insurer." An entity that offers, issues or renews a health insurance policy that provides medical or health care coverage by a health care facility or licensed health care provider and that is governed under any of the following:(1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV of that act.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations).(4) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."Licensed practitioner." A medical doctor, certified nurse practitioner or physician assistant licensed to practice in this Commonwealth whose scope of practice includes evaluation, assessment and diagnostic privileges as outlined by the scope of practice of the profession."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township or home rule municipality."Office." The Office of the State Fire Commissioner of the Commonwealth."Program." The Firefighter Cancer Screening Program established under section 102-M.Section 102-M. Firefighter Cancer Screening Program.(a) Establishment.--The Firefighter Cancer Screening Program 20260HB2394PN3580 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is established in the department. The department shall establish guidelines and procedures necessary for the implementation and administration of the program.(b) Purpose.--The program shall pay for out-of-pocket costs associated with annual cancer screening examinations for firefighters that are not otherwise covered by the eligible firefighter's health insurance policy.Section 103-M. Duties of department.The department shall administer the program and cooperate with the office as necessary to effectuate program goals, including data sharing, outreach and certification of eligible firefighters.Section 104-M. Firefighter Cancer Screening Fund.(a) Establishment.--(1) The Firefighter Cancer Screening Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury.(2) The fund shall consist of money appropriated or transferred to the fund by the General Assembly, in addition to any grants, gifts, donations or other payments from other sources.(b) Continuing appropriation.--Money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the uses provided under subsection (c).(c) Use.--Money in the fund shall be used for:(1) Costs incurred for cancer screening examinations undertaken by eligible firefighters that are not otherwise covered by the eligible firefighter's health insurance policy.(2) Administering the provisions of this article.Section 105-M. Benefits card.20260HB2394PN3580 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Benefits card.--The department shall develop a benefits card that eligible firefighters can use to pay for out-of-pocket costs associated with cancer screenings under the program. A benefits card may only be offered to an eligible firefighter.(b) Application.--The department shall develop an application form that an eligible firefighter may use to apply for a benefits card under the program.(c) Notice.--By January 1 of each year, the department shall provide application forms and written instructions for the use of benefits cards to:(1) The fire chief and president of each volunteer fire company.(2) The chief executive of each municipality in which a municipal fire company is located.(3) The head of each combined volunteer and municipal fire company and each airport fire company.(d) Posting.--The application forms and written instructions for the benefits card shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet websites of the department and office.(e) Oversight and tracking.--The department shall develop electronic controls, oversight mechanisms and follow-up procedures to detect and track the following:(1) Suspicious benefits card transactions that might indicate fraudulent use. In order to implement this paragraph, the department shall have the following duties:(i) Collect information regarding the use of benefits cards if more than 50% of the funds used in the benefits card transactions occur outside of this Commonwealth.(ii) Differentiate between benefits card 20260HB2394PN3580 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transactions that occur in states that border this Commonwealth and benefits card transactions that occur in states that do not border this Commonwealth.(iii) Analyze benefits card transactions that occur outside of this Commonwealth to determine if the recipient of benefits is a resident of this Commonwealth. In making a determination under this subparagraph, the department shall analyze the following:(A) The location of employment of the recipient of benefits.(B) The amount of times that the benefits card is used outside of this Commonwealth compared to the amount of times the benefits card is used in this Commonwealth.(C) Whether the benefits card transactions occur in person or through electronic means.(2) The use of benefits cards that might indicate an attempt to acquire goods and services that do not comply with this article.(f) Data and information.--Unless otherwise prohibited, data and information gathered under this section shall be made available to the Inspector General, Auditor General and Attorney General.Section 106-M. Firefighter eligibility.To be considered an eligible firefighter, a firefighter must be a career firefighter or volunteer firefighter who actively responded to at least 15 fire or rescue emergencies as determined by the firefighter's fire company during the previous calendar year.Section 107-M. Cancer screening.20260HB2394PN3580 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Eligibility.--An eligible firefighter shall have access to the use of a benefits card to cover the out-of-pocket costs associated with an annual cancer screening examination.(A) ELIGIBILITY.--AN ELIGIBLE FIREFIGHTER SHALL HAVE ACCESS TO THE USE OF A BENEFITS CARD TO COVER THE OUT-OF-POCKET COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH A CANCER SCREENING EXAMINATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.(B) SCREENING REQUIREMENT.--AN ELIGIBLE FIREFIGHTER SHALL UNDERGO A CANCER SCREENING EXAMINATION WITHIN THE FIRST THREE YEARS OF BECOMING ELIGIBLE UNDER THIS ARTICLE AND AT LEAST ONCE EVERY THREE YEARS THEREAFTER.(b) (C) Examination.--Each cancer screening examination shall:(1) Be administered by a licensed practitioner.(2) Include a multicancer early detection test.(3) Include screening for, if applicable, the following cancers:(i) Bladder.(ii) Blood.(iii) Breast.(iv) Colon.(v) Cervical.(vi) Esophageal.(vii) Gallbladder.(viii) Kidney.(ix) Liver.(x) Lung.(xi) Lymphatic system.(xii) Oral.(xiii) Ovarian.20260HB2394PN3580 - 8 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xiv) Prostate.(xv) Skin.(xvi) Testicular.(xvii) Thyroid.(xviii) Urinary.Section 108-M. Confidentiality.The health records of a firefighter which are associated with the cancer screening examinations under this article shall remain private and may not be shared with the fire company of the firefighter or any other person except with the written consent of the firefighter or as required under a governing collective bargaining agreement.Section 2. Section 1703-A(a) introductory paragraph and (b) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1703-A. Disposition of Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund.(a) Purpose.--[It] Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), it is the intent of the General Assembly that:* * *(b) Appropriation.--Except as provided under [subsection (c)] subsections (c) and (d), whenever the Governor determines that an appropriation from the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund is necessary to meet emergencies involving the health, safety or welfare of the residents of this Commonwealth or to counterbalance downturns of the economy which result in significant unanticipated revenue shortfalls, the Governor shall present a request for an appropriation which may include the specifics of the proposal and suggested ancillary and substantive legislation as may be necessary to the chairman of 20260HB2394PN3580 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairman of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives. The General Assembly may then through approval of a separate appropriation bill by a vote of two-thirds of the members elected to the Senate and the House of Representatives appropriate money from the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund to meet the needs identified in the Governor's proposal. Any money appropriated according to this section which has then lapsed shall be returned to the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund.* * *(d) Transfers for Firefighter Cancer Screening Program.--No later than January 1, 2027, $50,000,000 shall be transferred from the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund to the Firefighter Cancer Screening Fund as a one-time supplemental transfer for the purpose of funding the Firefighter Cancer Screening Program.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2394PN3580 - 10 - 12345678910111213141516